Utah statutes.
35A-1-105.   Department budget -- Reports from divisions.

(1)  The department shall prepare and submit to the governor for inclusion in the governor’s budget to be submitted to the Legislature, a budget of the department’s financial requirements needed to carry out its responsibilities as provided by law during the fiscal year following the Legislature’s next annual general session.

(2)  The executive director shall require a report from each of the divisions and offices of the department, to aid in preparation of the departmental budget.

